Utah statutes.
17D-2-107.   Local building authority not subject to any state board, commission, or agency.

Neither a local building authority nor a project is subject to the jurisdiction of any board, commission, or agency of the state, including the Public Service Commission.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

